Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2242.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 501 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 501. Powers of Governor.(a) Governor as Commander-in-Chief.--The Governor of this Commonwealth as Commander-in-Chief shall have the powers enumerated hereafter in this title over the Pennsylvania military forces which includes the Pennsylvania National Guard when not absent from this Commonwealth on the call or order of the United States and the Pennsylvania Guard when formed, organized and equipped under order from the Governor in conformity with this title.(b) Prohibition on outside armed military forces.--1234567891011121314151617 (1) An armed military force from another state or territory may not enter this Commonwealth for the purpose of engaging in military duty unless:(i) The Governor has provided express permission to the force.(ii) The force has been called into Federal service and is acting under authority of the President of the United States.(2) The Governor may provide express permission to an armed military force under paragraph (1) for not more than 30 days in a calendar year, unless a longer period of time is approved by concurrent resolution of the General Assembly.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2242PN2935 - 2 - 12345678910111213